Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1983.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-9-127 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, “resource family partner” means a
private, child-placing agency under contract with the Department of
Human Services to recruit, retain, and support foster homes to meet
the child’s needs through service coordination and delivery in
conjunction with the Department.
B. For the purpose of aiding resource family partners in
improving outcomes for foster children and parents and identifying
areas of need within the foster care system, the Department of Human
Services shall provide foster care data to resource family partners
as described in this section at regular monthly intervals.

C. The foster care data provided to resource family partners
shall be up-to-date, aggregated, and de-identified. The data shall
include, at a minimum:
1. The number of children without placement each day, including
demographic and geographic data;
2. Demographic and geographic data of foster parents and
children;
3. Geographic areas where there is a high need for, but low
availability of, placements;
4. Geographic areas experiencing a high number of disruptions
in placement;
5. The number of sibling groups that are separated in different
placements;
6. The number of foster children that are in placements a long
distance from their home community; and
7. Any relevant measures, outcomes, or other evaluation data
related to the foster care system maintained by the Department.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1983 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 16th day of February, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1983 Page 3